Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 2
VOTING

7-127-201. Members list for meeting and action by written ballot.

Unless otherwise provided by the bylaws, after fixing a record date for a notice of a meeting or for determining the members entitled to take action by written ballot, a nonprofit corporation shall prepare an alphabetical list of the names of all its members who are entitled to notice of, and to vote at, the meeting or to take such action by written ballot. The list shall show the address of each member entitled to notice of, and to vote at, the meeting or to take such action by written ballot and the number of votes each member is entitled to vote at the meeting or by written ballot.

If prepared in connection with a meeting of the members, the members list shall be available for inspection by any member entitled to vote at the meeting, beginning the earlier of ten days before the meeting for which the list was prepared or two business days after notice of the meeting is given and continuing through the meeting, and any adjournment thereof, at the nonprofit corporation's principal office or at a place identified in the notice of the meeting in the city where the meeting will be held. The nonprofit corporation shall make the members list available at the meeting, and any member entitled to vote at the meeting or an agent or attorney of a member entitled to vote at the meeting is entitled to inspect the list at any time during the meeting or any adjournment. If prepared in connection with action to be taken by the members by written ballot, the members list shall be available for inspection by any member entitled to cast a vote by such written ballot, beginning on the date that the first written ballot is delivered to the members and continuing through the time when such written ballots must be received by the nonprofit corporation in order to be counted, at the nonprofit corporation's principal office. A member entitled to vote at the meeting or by such written ballot, or an agent or attorney of a member entitled to vote at the meeting or by such written ballot, is entitled on written demand to inspect and, subject to the requirements of section 7-136-102 (3) and the provisions of section 7-136-103 (2) and (3), to copy the list, during regular business hours, at the member's expense, and during the period it is available for inspection.

If the nonprofit corporation refuses to allow a member entitled to vote at the meeting or by such written ballot, or an agent or attorney of a member entitled to vote at the meeting or by such written ballot, to inspect the members list or to copy the list during the period it is required to be available for inspection under subsection (2) of this section, the district court for the county in this state in which the street address of the nonprofit corporation's principal office is located or, if the nonprofit corporation has no principal office in this state, the district court for the county in which the street address of its registered agent is located, or if the nonprofit corporation has no registered agent in this state, the district court for the city and county of Denver may, on application of the member, summarily order the inspection or copying of the list at the nonprofit corporation's expense and may postpone or adjourn the meeting for which the list was prepared, or postpone the time when the nonprofit corporation must receive written ballots in connection with which the list was prepared, until the inspection or copying is complete.

If a court orders inspection or copying of the list of members pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, unless the nonprofit corporation proves that it refused inspection or copying of the list in good faith because it had a reasonable basis for doubt about the right of the member or the agent or attorney of the member to inspect or copy the list of members:

The court shall also order the nonprofit corporation to pay the member's costs, including reasonable counsel fees, incurred in obtaining the order;

The court may order the nonprofit corporation to pay the member for any damages the member incurred; and

The court may grant the member any other remedy afforded the member by law.

If a court orders inspection or copying of the list of members pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the court may impose reasonable restrictions on the use or distribution of the list by the member.

Failure to prepare or make available the list of members does not affect the validity of action taken at the meeting or by means of such written ballot.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 681, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(3) amended, p. 2339, § 297, effective July 1, 2004.

7-127-202. Voting entitlement generally.

Unless otherwise provided by the bylaws:

Only voting members shall be entitled to vote with respect to any matter required or permitted under articles 121 to 137 of this title to be submitted to a vote of the members;

All references in articles 121 to 137 of this title to votes of or voting by the members shall be deemed to permit voting only by the voting members; and

Voting members shall be entitled to vote with respect to all matters required or permitted under articles 121 to 137 of this title to be submitted to a vote of the members.

Unless otherwise provided by the bylaws, each member entitled to vote shall be entitled to one vote on each matter submitted to a vote of members.

Unless otherwise provided by the bylaws, if a membership stands of record in the names of two or more persons, their acts with respect to voting shall have the following effect:

If only one votes, such act binds all; and

If more than one votes, the vote shall be divided on a pro rata basis.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 683, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-127-203. Proxies.

Unless otherwise provided by the bylaws, a member entitled to vote may vote or otherwise act in person or by proxy.

Without limiting the manner in which a member may appoint a proxy to vote or otherwise act for the member, the following shall constitute valid means of such appointment:

A member may appoint a proxy by signing an appointment form, either personally or by the member's attorney-in-fact.

A member may appoint a proxy by transmitting or authorizing the transmission of a telegram, teletype, or other electronic transmission providing a written statement of the appointment to the proxy, to a proxy solicitor, proxy support service organization, or other person duly authorized by the proxy to receive appointments as agent for the proxy or to the nonprofit corporation; except that the transmitted appointment shall set forth or be transmitted with written evidence from which it can be determined that the member transmitted or authorized the transmission of the appointment.

An appointment of a proxy is effective against the nonprofit corporation when received by the nonprofit corporation, including receipt by the nonprofit corporation of an appointment transmitted pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section. An appointment is valid for eleven months unless a different period is expressly provided in the appointment form.

Any complete copy, including an electronically transmitted facsimile, of an appointment of a proxy may be substituted for or used in lieu of the original appointment for any purpose for which the original appointment could be used.

An appointment of a proxy is revocable by the member.

Appointment of a proxy is revoked by the person appointing the proxy:

Attending any meeting and voting in person; or

Signing and delivering to the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate proxy votes either a writing stating that the appointment of the proxy is revoked or a subsequent appointment form.

The death or incapacity of the member appointing a proxy does not affect the right of the nonprofit corporation to accept the proxy's authority unless notice of the death or incapacity is received by the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes before the proxy exercises the proxy's authority under the appointment.

Subject to section 7-127-204 and to any express limitation on the proxy's authority appearing on the appointment form, a nonprofit corporation is entitled to accept the proxy's vote or other action as that of the member making the appointment.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 683, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-127-204. Nonprofit corporation's acceptance of votes.

If the name signed on a vote, consent, written ballot, waiver, proxy appointment, or proxy appointment revocation corresponds to the name of a member, the nonprofit corporation, if acting in good faith, is entitled to accept the vote, consent, written ballot, waiver, proxy appointment, or proxy appointment revocation and to give it effect as the act of the member.

If the name signed on a vote, consent, written ballot, waiver, proxy appointment, or proxy appointment revocation does not correspond to the name of a member, the nonprofit corporation, if acting in good faith, is nevertheless entitled to accept the vote, consent, written ballot, waiver, proxy appointment, or proxy appointment revocation and to give it effect as the act of the member if:

The member is an entity and the name signed purports to be that of an officer or agent of the entity;

The name signed purports to be that of an administrator, executor, guardian, or conservator representing the member and, if the nonprofit corporation requests, evidence of fiduciary status acceptable to the nonprofit corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, written ballot, waiver, proxy appointment, or proxy appointment revocation;

The name signed purports to be that of a receiver or trustee in bankruptcy of the member and, if the nonprofit corporation requests, evidence of this status acceptable to the nonprofit corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, written ballot, waiver, proxy appointment, or proxy appointment revocation;

The name signed purports to be that of a pledgee, beneficial owner, or attorney-in-fact of the member and, if the nonprofit corporation requests, evidence acceptable to the nonprofit corporation of the signatory's authority to sign for the member has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, written ballot, waiver, proxy appointment, or proxy appointment revocation;

Two or more persons are the member as cotenants or fiduciaries and the name signed purports to be the name of at least one of the cotenants or fiduciaries and the person signing appears to be acting on behalf of all the cotenants or fiduciaries; or

The acceptance of the vote, consent, written ballot, waiver, proxy appointment, or proxy appointment revocation is otherwise proper under rules established by the nonprofit corporation that are not inconsistent with the provisions of this subsection (2).

The nonprofit corporation is entitled to reject a vote, consent, written ballot, waiver, proxy appointment, or proxy appointment revocation if the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes, acting in good faith, has reasonable basis for doubt about the validity of the signature on it or about the signatory's authority to sign for the member.

The nonprofit corporation and its officer or agent who accepts or rejects a vote, consent, written ballot, waiver, proxy appointment, or proxy appointment revocation in good faith and in accordance with the standards of this section are not liable in damages for the consequences of the acceptance or rejection.

Corporate action based on the acceptance or rejection of a vote, consent, written ballot, waiver, proxy appointment, or proxy appointment revocation under this section is valid unless a court of competent jurisdiction determines otherwise.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 684, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-127-205. Quorum and voting requirements for voting groups.

Members entitled to vote as a separate voting group may take action on a matter at a meeting only if a quorum of those members exists with respect to that matter. Unless otherwise provided in articles 121 to 137 of this title or the bylaws, twenty-five percent of the votes entitled to be cast on the matter by the voting group constitutes a quorum of that voting group for action on that matter.

Once a member is represented for any purpose at a meeting, including the purpose of determining that a quorum exists, the member is deemed present for quorum purposes for the remainder of the meeting and for any adjournment of that meeting, unless otherwise provided in the bylaws or unless a new record date is or shall be set for that adjourned meeting.

If a quorum exists, action on a matter other than the election of directors by a voting group is approved if the votes cast within the voting group favoring the action exceed the votes cast within the voting group opposing the action, unless a greater number of affirmative votes is required by articles 121 to 137 of this title or the bylaws.

An amendment to the articles of incorporation or the bylaws adding, changing, or deleting a quorum or voting requirement for a voting group greater than that specified in subsection (1) or (3) of this section is governed by section 7-127-207 (2).

The election of directors is governed by section 7-127-208.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 686, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-127-206. Action by single and multiple voting groups.

If articles 121 to 137 of this title or the bylaws provide for voting by a single voting group on a matter, action on that matter is taken when voted upon by that voting group as provided in section 7-127-205.

If articles 121 to 137 of this title or the bylaws provide for voting by two or more voting groups on a matter, action on that matter is taken only when voted upon by each of those voting groups counted separately as provided in section 7-127-205. One voting group may vote on a matter even though no action is taken by another voting group entitled to vote on the matter.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 686, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-127-207. Lesser or greater quorum or greater voting requirements.

The bylaws may provide for a lesser or a greater quorum requirement, or a greater voting requirement for members or voting groups than is provided for by articles 121 to 137 of this title.

An amendment to the articles of incorporation or the bylaws that adds, changes, or deletes a lesser or a greater quorum requirement or a greater voting requirement shall meet the same quorum requirement and be adopted by the same vote and voting groups required to take action under the quorum and voting requirements then in effect or proposed to be adopted, whichever is greater.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 686, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 623, § 27, effective July 1.

7-127-208. Voting for directors - cumulative voting.

If the bylaws provide for cumulative voting for directors by the voting members, voting members may so vote, by multiplying the number of votes the voting members are entitled to cast by the number of directors for whom they are entitled to vote and cast the product for a single candidate or distribute the product among two or more candidates.

Cumulative voting is not authorized at a particular meeting unless:

The meeting notice or statement accompanying the notice states that cumulative voting will take place; or

A voting member gives notice during the meeting and before the vote is taken of the voting member's intent to cumulate votes, and if one voting member gives this notice all other voting members participating in the election are entitled to cumulate their votes without giving further notice.

If cumulative voting is in effect, a director may not be removed if the number of votes cast against such removal, or not consenting in writing to such removal, would be sufficient to elect such director if voted cumulatively at an election for such director.

Members may not vote cumulatively if the directors and members are identical.

In an election of multiple directors, that number of candidates equaling the number of directors to be elected, having the highest number of votes cast in favor of their election, are elected to the board of directors. When only one director is being voted upon, the affirmative vote of a majority of the members constituting a quorum at the meeting at which the election occurs shall be required for election to the board of directors.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 687, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-127-209. Other methods of electing directors.

A nonprofit corporation may provide in its bylaws for election of directors by voting members or delegates:

On the basis of chapter or other organizational unit;

By region or other geographic unit;

By preferential voting; or

By any other reasonable method.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 687, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.